Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,136
Dissolved corporation; trustees; appointment.

If a corporation is ousted and dissolved by the proceedings herein authorized, the court shall appoint three disinterested persons as trustees of the creditors and stockholders.

R.S.1867, Code § 719, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8343;

C.S.1922, § 9295;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,127;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,136.

Court ousting foreign corporation may appoint trustees for its creditors and stockholders. State ex rel. Spillman v. Brictson Mfg. Co., 114 Neb. 341, 207 N.W. 664 (1926), affirming 113 Neb. 781, 205 N.W. 246 (1925).

State court judgment ousting foreign corporation and appointing trustees for its property in Nebraska upheld as against collateral attack in federal court. Brictson Mfg. Co. v. Close, 25 F.2d 794 (8th Cir. 1928).